Utah statutes.
58-83-305.   Duties and responsibilities.
(1)  The online prescriber shall:
(a)  be held to the same standards of appropriate practice as those applicable
in traditional settings which, for purposes of this chapter, include the
delivery of online pharmaceutical services;
(b)  conduct an assessment and diagnosis based upon a comprehensive health
history and an assessment tool such as a branching questionnaire;
(c)  ensure that a comprehensive health history, assessment, and diagnosis
have been made before prescribing any medication;
(d)  conduct the online assessment and diagnosis only through the approved
Internet facilitator identified in the online prescriber's application;
(e)  comply with all applicable state and federal laws, rules, regulations,
and orders;
(f)  inform the patient electronically of the benefits and risks of
appropriate treatment;
(g)  guide the patient regarding the optimal course of action;
(h)  treat the patient with courtesy, respect, dignity, responsiveness, and
timely attention to the patient's needs;
(i)  comply with the requirements for confidentiality as required by this
title and applicable federal law;
(j)  continue to provide the user with reasonable assistance and sufficient
opportunity to make alternative arrangements for care;
(k)  be available for ongoing consultation with the patient through e-mail or
other forms of communication;
(l)  not delegate to a third party the professional responsibility to:
(i)  review and evaluate the results of the branching questionnaire;
(ii)  consult with the patient electronically or through other means about the
patient's medical condition; and
(iii)  diagnose and prescribe medications to the patient;
(m)  conduct the online assessment and diagnosis and the electronic
communication between the online prescriber and the patient only through the
approved Internet facilitator;
(n) (i)  maintain the online medical records of the patient; and
(ii)  if maintenance of the records is delegated by the online prescriber,
delegate that authority only to the approved Internet facilitator;
(o)  inform a patient of the patient's freedom of choice to select the
pharmacy to dispense the patient's prescription by providing the patient with
the phone number of the online contract pharmacy so that the patient may
contact the online contract pharmacy and request a transfer of the
prescription to another pharmacy; and
(p)  authorize the Internet facilitator to provide the online contract
pharmacy with the patient's:
(i)  full name;
(ii)  current address and telephone number;
(iii)  date of birth or age and gender;
(iv)  height, weight, and vital signs (if known);
(v)  medication allergies or drug reactions; and
(vi)  current medications, including over-the-counter products, and any
additional comments relevant to the patient's drug use.
(2)  The online contract pharmacy shall:
(a)  only dispense prescription drugs that:
(i)  are approved by the division in accordance with Section 58-83-306; and
(ii)  were prescribed by an online prescriber who is using the Internet
facilitator that is under contract with the online contract pharmacy;
(b)  maintain a toll-free number with a pharmacist available for patients
using the services of the online contract pharmacy to receive medications
prescribed online;
(c)  use a tracking identification number system when shipping medications
prescribed for patients by an online prescriber; and
(d)  provide to the division a quarterly report of all drugs dispensed in
accordance with this chapter.
(3)  The Internet facilitator shall:
(a)  provide services that the online prescriber will use in implementing the
branching questionnaire;
(b)  provide electronic or telephonic communication between the online
prescriber and the patient that:
(i)  is secure and confidential;
(ii)  allows the online prescriber to be directly accessible to a patient to
answer questions regarding the patient's treatment plan; and
(iii)  provides privacy and security that complies with the provisions of 45
C.F.R. Parts 160, 162, and 164, Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996;
(c)  facilitate secure and confidential communication of the prescription
issued by the online prescriber to the online contract pharmacy in accordance
with Subsection (1)(p);
(d)  disclose on its website:
(i)  the owner of the website;
(ii)  the specific services provided by any associated online prescribers; and
(iii)  other information the division may require by rule; and
(e) (i)  only facilitate the delivery of online pharmaceutical services for
the specific legend drugs approved by the division in accordance with Section
58-83-306; or
(ii)  not facilitate, directly or indirectly, through related entities or
affiliates, the dispensing or online prescribing of any drug whether
controlled or legend that is not specifically approved under Section
58-83-306.
